District of Columbia statutes.
51-151

Employer contributions by the District of Columbia.

Appropriations for the District of Columbia shall be available for payment by the District of Columbia of its contributions as an employer, in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of this chapter.

History

June 28, 1944, 58 Stat. 530, ch. 300, § 2

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 46-104.
1973 Ed., § 46-303a.